Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 21. Schedule

§ 1. Acquired rights continue.

That no inconvenience may arise from a change of the territorial government to a permanent state government, it is declared that all writs, actions, prosecutions, claims, liabilities and obligations against the Territory of Wyoming, of whatever nature, and rights of individuals, and of bodies corporate, shall continue as if no change had taken place in this government, and all process which may, before the organization of the judicial department under this constitution, be issued under the authority of the Territory of Wyoming, shall be as valid as if issued in the name of the state.

Construction of statutes. —

In construing statutes, it is inappropriate to emphasize passing of Wyoming from territory to statehood, except where difference in form of government makes that necessary. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Territorial corporations. —

Corporations created by territory of Wyoming must be considered as corporations of the state to same extent as if they derived their corporate existence directly from state. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Applied

in

In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(1893).

§ 2. Territorial property vested in state.

All property, real and personal, and all moneys, credits, claims and choses in action, belonging to the Territory of Wyoming, at the time of the adoption of this constitution, shall be vested in and become the property of the State of Wyoming.

§ 3. Territorial laws become state laws.

All laws now in force in the Territory of Wyoming, which are not repugnant to this constitution, shall remain in force until they expire by their own limitation, or be altered or repealed by the legislature.

Construction of statutes. —

In construing statutes, it is inappropriate to emphasize passing of Wyoming from territory to statehood, except where difference in form of government makes that necessary. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Act legally enacted was continued in force

by this section. State v. Smart, 22 Wyo. 154, 136 P. 452,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1913).

Statutes enacted before adoption of the constitution and carried forward into compilation of state laws remain in force insofar as they are not repugnant to the constitution, under the provisions of this section. State ex rel. Cone v. Bernweiser, 39 Wyo. 314, 271 P. 13,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1928).

Claims against territory. —

The constitution did not abrogate any of the territorial statutes relative to the auditing and settling of claims against the territory. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Territorial corporations. —

Corporations created by territory of Wyoming must be considered as corporations of the state to same extent as if they derived their corporate existence directly from state. Drew v. Beckwith, Quinn & Co., 57 Wyo. 140, 114 P.2d 98,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 140, 115 P.2d 651,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1941).

Organization of county. —

Big Horn county was not organized before the adoption of the constitution, and proceedings for its organization could not be taken until it had a population of 1,500. Board of Comm'rs v. Perkins, 5 Wyo. 166, 38 P. 915,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1895).

Law regarding apportionment of assets and debts on the organization of new counties was continued hereby. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Counties could sue in their corporate name on territorial bonds

of county officers. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

City charters. —

A section in a city charter providing that on appeal from the police justice in a prosecution for the violation of a city ordinance, the case shall stand for trial at the next term of the district court upon the transcript, and that no trial de novo shall be had, was continued in force by this section as it existed in the charter at the time the constitution was adopted, in the absence of conflicting legislation. Stutsman v. Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1911).

Limitation on amount of damages for death or injury. —

Statutory provision limiting the amount of recovery for death to $5,000 was not repealed or repugnant to the constitution on its adoption. Mestas v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 12 Wyo. 414, 76 P. 567,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1904).

Article 10, § 4, Wyo. Const., prohibiting enactment of legislation limiting the amount of damages to be recovered for causing injury or death of any person, applies to future legislation only, and it does not, therefore, repeal or abrogate a statute previously enacted. Burton v. Union Pac. Coal Co., 18 Wyo. 362, 107 P. 391,

1910 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1910), reh'g denied, 18 Wyo. 362, 112 P. 841,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1911).

Territorial law authorizing imprisonment in Illinois penitentiary

was continued in force by the provision of this section. Kingen v. Kelley, 3 Wyo. 566, 28 P. 36,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1891).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1892).

§ 4. Accrued fines go to state.

All fines, penalties, forfeitures and escheats, accruing to the Territory of Wyoming, shall accrue to the use of the state.

§ 5. State to sue on bonds and prosecute crimes.

All recognizances, bonds, obligations or other undertakings heretofore taken, or which may be taken before the organization of the judicial department under this constitution shall remain valid, and shall pass over to and may be prosecuted in the name of the state, and all bonds, obligations or other undertakings executed to this territory, or to any officer in his official capacity, shall pass over to the proper state authority and to their successors in office, for the uses therein respectively expressed, and may be sued for and recovered accordingly. All criminal prosecutions and penal actions which have arisen or which may arise before the organization of the judicial department under this constitution, and which shall then be pending, may be prosecuted to judgment and execution in the name of the state.

Counties could sue in their corporate name on territorial bonds

of county officers. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 6. Territorial officers to hold over.

All officers, civil and military, holding their offices and appointments in this territory, under the authority of the United States or under the authority of this territory, shall continue to hold and exercise their respective offices and appointments until suspended under this constitution.

Governor. —

A person elected governor had no power to assume the duties of the office before the canvass was made. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 7. Submission of constitution.

This constitution shall be submitted for adoption or rejection to a vote of the qualified electors of this territory, at an election to be held on the first Tuesday in November, A. D. 1889. Said election, as nearly as may be, shall be conducted in all respects in the same manner as provided by the laws of the territory for general elections, and the returns thereof shall be made to the secretary of said territory, who with the governor and chief justice thereof, or any two of them, shall canvass the same, and if a majority of the legal votes cast shall be for the constitution the governor shall certify the result to the president of the United States, together with a statement of the votes cast thereon and a copy of said constitution, articles, propositions and ordinances. At the said election the ballots shall be in the following form: “For the constitution——Yes. No.” And as a heading to each of said ballots, shall be printed on each ballot the following instructions to voters: “All persons who desire to vote for the constitution may erase the word ‘No.’ All persons who desire to vote against the constitution may erase the word ‘Yes.’” Any person may have printed or written on his ballot only the words: “For the Constitution,” or “Against the Constitution,” and such ballots shall be counted for or against the constitution accordingly.

§ 8. When constitution takes effect.

This constitution shall take effect and be in full force immediately upon the admission of the territory as a state.

Constitution went into effect on July 10, 1890,

the date of the approval of the Act of Admission. State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1908).

§ 9. First state election; time of holding; proclamation.

Immediately upon the admission of the territory as a state, the governor of the territory, or in case of his absence or failure to act, the secretary of the territory, or in case of his absence or failure to act, the president of this convention, shall issue a proclamation, which shall be published and a copy thereof mailed to the chairman of the board of county commissioners of each county, calling an election by the people for all state, district and other officers, created and made elective by this constitution, and fixing a day for such election, which shall not be less than forty days after the date of such proclamation nor more than ninety days after the admission of the territory as a state.

Cross references. —

For provisions dealing with suffrage and elections, see art. 6, §§ 1 to 22, Wyo. Const., and title 22.

§ 10. First state election; duty of county commissioners; who may vote; conduct of election.

The board of commissioners of the several counties shall thereupon order such election for said day, and shall cause notice thereof to be given, in the manner and for the length of time provided by the laws of the territory in cases of general elections for delegate to congress, and county and other officers. Every qualified elector of the territory at the date of said election shall be entitled to vote thereat. Said election shall be conducted in all respects in the same manner as provided by the laws of the territory for general elections, and the returns thereof shall be made to the canvassing board hereinafter provided for.

§ 11. First state election; board of canvassers.

The governor, secretary of the territory and president of this convention, or a majority of them, shall constitute a board of canvassers to canvass the vote of such election for member of congress, all state and district officers and members of the legislature. The said board shall assemble at the seat of government of the territory on the thirtieth day after the day of such election (or on the following day if such day fall on Sunday) and proceed to canvass the votes for all state and district officers and members of the legislature, in the manner provided by the laws of the territory for canvassing the vote for delegate to congress, and they shall issue certificates of election to the persons found to be elected to said offices, severally, and shall make and file with the secretary of the territory an abstract certified by them of the number of votes cast for each person, for each of said offices, and of the total number of votes cast in each county.

§ 12. When officers shall qualify; oaths; bonds.

All officers elected at such election, except members of the legislature, shall, within thirty days after they have been declared elected, take the oath required by this constitution, and give the same bond required by law of the territory to be given in case of like officers of the territory or district, and shall thereupon enter upon the duties of their respective offices; but the legislature may require by law all such officers to give other or further bonds as a condition of their continuance in office.

§ 13. First state legislature.

The governor elect of the state, immediately upon his qualifying and entering upon the duties of his office, shall issue his proclamation convening the legislature of the state at the seat of government, on a day to be named in said proclamation, and which shall not be less than thirty nor more than sixty days after the date of such proclamation. Within ten days after the organization of the legislature, both houses of the legislature, in joint session, shall then there proceed to elect, as provided by law, two senators of the United States for the State of Wyoming. At said election the two persons who shall receive the majority of all the votes cast by said senators and representatives shall be elected as such United States senators, and shall be so declared by the presiding officers of said joint session. The presiding officers of the senate and house shall issue a certificate to each of said senators, certifying his election, which certificates shall also be signed by the governor and attested by the secretary of state.

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning legislature, see art. 3, §§ 1 to 52, Wyo. Const., and title 28.

§ 14. Laws to be passed.

The legislature shall pass all necessary laws to carry into effect the provisions of this constitution.

§ 15. Transfer of pending causes, records and seal of courts.

Whenever any two of the judges of the supreme court of the state, elected under the provisions of this constitution, shall have qualified in their offices, the causes then pending in the supreme court of the territory, and the papers, records and proceedings of said court, and the seal and other property pertaining thereto, shall pass into the jurisdiction and possession of the supreme court of the state; and until so superseded the supreme court of the territory and the judges thereof shall continue with like powers and jurisdiction, as if this constitution had not been adopted. Whenever the judge of the district court of any district, elected under the provisions of this constitution, shall have qualified in office, the several causes then pending in the district court of the territory, within any county in such district, and the records, papers and proceedings of said district court and the seal and other property pertaining thereto, shall pass into the jurisdiction and possession of the district court of the state for such county; and until the district courts of this territory shall be superseded in the manner aforesaid, the said district courts and the judges thereof shall continue with the same jurisdiction and power to be exercised in the same judicial districts respectively as heretofore constituted under the laws of the territory.

§ 16. Court seals.

Until otherwise provided by law the seals now in use in the supreme and district courts of this territory are hereby declared to be the seals of the supreme and district courts, respectively, of the state.

§ 17. Transfer of causes and records from probate courts to district courts.

Whenever this constitution shall go into effect, records and papers and proceedings of the probate court in each county, and all causes and matters of administration and other matters pending therein, shall pass into the jurisdiction and possession of the district court of the same county, and the said district court shall proceed to final decree or judgment order or other determination in the said several matters and causes, as the said probate court might have done if this constitution had not been adopted.

Territorial probate court abolished. —

The territorial probate court and the office of judge thereof was abolished by the adoption of the constitution. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Term “district court” is used in a broad or inclusive sense

as if there were one district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were one district court in a given county for the several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

§ 18. How legislature chosen.

Senators and members of the house of representatives shall be chosen by the qualified electors of the several senatorial and representative districts as established in this constitution, until such districts shall be changed by law, and thereafter by the qualified electors of the several districts as the same shall be established by law.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908).

§ 19. Duration of terms of territorial county and precinct officers.

All county and precinct officers who may be in office at the time of the adoption of this constitution, shall hold their respective offices for the full time for which they may have been elected, and until such time as their successors may be elected and qualified, as may be provided by law, and the official bonds of all such officers shall continue in full force and effect as though this constitution had not been adopted.

Territorial probate court abolished. —

The territorial probate court and the office of judge thereof was abolished by the adoption of the constitution. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Counties could sue in their corporate name on territorial bonds

of county officers. Board Comm'rs Sweetwater County v. Young, 3 Wyo. 684, 29 P. 1002,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 20. Terms of state officers first elected.

Members of the legislature and all state officers, district and supreme judges elected at the first election held under this constitution shall hold their respective offices for the full term next ensuing such election, in addition to the period intervening between the date of their qualification and the commencement of such full term.

Election of appointee filling vacancy in office of state treasurer. —

Where a person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of state treasurer is afterward elected to the office at a general election held before the term of his predecessor would have expired, he is not entitled to hold the office for four years after such election, but only for the remainder of his predecessor's term. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Judge of the district court who was elected to fill a vacancy

was entitled to hold the office for the full term of six years. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

§ 21. Regular session of legislature following first session.

If the first session of the legislature under this constitution shall be concluded within twelve months of the time designated for a regular session thereof, then the next regular session following said special session shall be omitted.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908).

§ 22. Regular election following first session of legislature to be omitted.

The first regular election that would otherwise occur following the first session of the legislature, shall be omitted, and all county and precinct officers elected at the first election held under this constitution shall hold their office for the full term thereof, commencing at the expiration of the term of the county and precinct officers then in office, or the date of their qualification.

Cited

in

State ex rel. Sullivan v. Schnitger, 16 Wyo. 479, 95 P. 698,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(1908).

§ 23. Why constitution framed.

This convention does hereby declare on behalf of the people of the Territory of Wyoming, that this constitution has been prepared and submitted to the people of the Territory of Wyoming for their adoption or rejection, with no purpose of setting up or organizing a state government until such time as the congress of the United States shall enact a law for the admission of the Territory of Wyoming as a state under its provisions.

Ordinances

The following article [sections] shall be irrevocable without the consent of the United States and the people of this state:

§ 24. State part of United States.

The State of Wyoming is an inseparable part of the federal union and the constitution of the United States is the supreme law of the land.

Applied in

Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Oct. 23, 2015).

Primacy of the United States supreme court in constitutional areas is firmly embedded

in the law by judicial decision and the state constitution. Doe v. Burk, 513 P.2d 643,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1973).

Quoted

in

Schaefer v. Thomson, 240 F. Supp. 247, 1964 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 7892 (D. Wyo. 1964).

§ 25. Religious liberty.

Perfect toleration of religious sentiment shall be secured, and no inhabitant of this state shall ever be molested in person or property on account of his or her mode of religious worship.

Cross references. —

For another provision relative to religious liberty, see art. 1, § 18, Wyo. Const.

Religious belief not violated.

Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 18, and Wyo. Cost. art. 21, § 25, were not violated where the judge was being disciplined for declining to uphold the United States and Wyoming Constitutions by refusing to perform same-sex marriages, not due to her religious beliefs. Neely v. Wyo. Comm'n on Judicial Conduct & Ethics, 2017 WY 25, 390 P.3d 728,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2017), cert. denied, 138 S. Ct. 639, 199 L. Ed. 2d 527, 2018 U.S. LEXIS 103 (U.S. 2018).

Applied

in

Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970).

Cited

in

Williams v. Eaton, 333 F. Supp. 107, 1971 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11210 (D. Wyo. 1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

Power of court or other public agency to order medical treatment over parental religious objections for child whose life is not immediately endangered, 21 ALR5th 248.

Validity, construction, and application of Religious Freedom Restoration Act (42 USC § 2000bb et seq.), 135 ALR Fed 121.

§ 26. Ownership of certain lands disclaimed; restriction on taxation of nonresidents.

The people inhabiting this state do agree and declare that they forever disclaim all right and title to the unappropriated public lands lying within the boundaries thereof, and to all lands lying within said limits owned or held by any Indian or Indian tribes, and that until the title thereto shall have been extinguished by the United States, the same shall be and remain subject to the disposition of the United States and that said Indian lands shall remain under the absolute jurisdiction and control of the congress of the United States; that the lands belonging to the citizens of the United States residing without this state shall never be taxed at a higher rate than the lands belonging to residents of this state; that no taxes shall be imposed by this state on lands or property therein, belonging to, or which may hereafter be purchased by the United States, or reserved for its use. But nothing in this article shall preclude this state from taxing as other lands are taxed, any lands owned or held by any Indian who has severed his tribal relations, and has obtained from the United States or from any person, a title thereto, by patent or other grant, save and except such lands as have been or may be granted to any Indian or Indians under any acts of congress containing a provision exempting the lands thus granted from taxation, which last mentioned lands shall be exempt from taxation so long, and to such an extent, as is, or may be provided in the act of congress granting the same.

State allowed to adjudicate Indian water rights. —

This section only bars state jurisdiction over Indian water rights when federal law also bars that jurisdiction. Congress' policy under the federal McCarran Amendment is to allow state courts to adjudicate Indian water rights as part of general stream adjudications. Because of the McCarran Amendment, there is no federal law which prevents the state from adjudicating the Indian water rights on the In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in Big Horn River Sys., 753 P.2d 76,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1988), aff'd, 492 U.S. 406, 109 S. Ct. 2994, 106 L. Ed. 2d 342, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3173 (U.S. 1989), cert. denied, 492 U.S. 926, 109 S. Ct. 3265, 106 L. Ed. 2d 610, 1989 U.S. LEXIS 3337 (U.S. 1989), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

State engineer had jurisdiction with reference to power dam construction on former Indian lands

where the title had passed from the United States as trustee into private ownership. Clarke v. Boysen, 39 F.2d 800, 1930 U.S. App. LEXIS 4152 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 282 U.S. 869, 51 S. Ct. 75, 75 L. Ed. 768 (U.S. 1930).

Cited

in

Schakel v. State, 513 P.2d 412,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1973).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “State Disclaimers of Jurisdiction Over Indians: A Bar to the McCarran Amendment?” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 175 (1983).

For article, “Wyoming Land and the Law One Hundred Years After Statehood — A Perspective,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of federal assault statute (18 USC § 113) on prosecutions under Assimilative Crimes Act (18 USC § 13) making state criminal laws applicable to acts committed on federal reservations, 57 ALR Fed 957.

§ 27. Territorial liabilities assumed.

All debts and liabilities of the Territory of Wyoming shall be assumed and paid by this state.

§ 28. Legislature to provide for public schools.

The legislature shall make laws for the establishment and maintenance of systems of public schools which shall be open to all the children of the state and free from sectarian control.

Cross references. —

As to education generally, see art. 7, §§ 1 to 23, Wyo. Const., and title 21.

Quoted

in

State ex rel. R.R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1947); Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980); Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

RM v. Washakie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 2004 WY 162, 102 P.3d 868,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 208

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Through the Front Door,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 164 (1965).

For article, “Politics and the Constitution: Federal Aid to Parochial Schools,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 475 (1966).

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 229 (1972).

For comment, “Education for Handicapped Children in Wyoming: What Constitutes a Free Appropriate Public Education and Other Administrative Hurdles,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1984).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “EDUCATIONAL LAW — Wyoming Refuses to Recognize Compensatory Education as a Remedy Under the Education for All Handicapped Children Act of 1975. Natrona County School Dist. No. 1 v. McKnight, 764 P.2d 1039,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 529 (1989).

Editor's notes. —

In the original constitution the sections under the heading “Ordinances” were numbered 1 to 5, but to avoid confusion in making references, they have been renumbered 24 to 28 so as to make the section numbers of this article run consecutively.

Constitution of the State of Wyoming Appx

Done in open convention, at the City of Cheyenne, in the Territory of Wyoming, this 30th day of September in the year of our Lord one thousand eight hundred and eighty-nine.

Attested: John K. Jeffrey,
Secretary. President. Melville C. Brown, Geo. W. Baxter, A. C. Campbell, J. A. Casebeer, C. D. Clark, Henry A. Coffeen, Asbury B. Conaway, Henry S. Elliott, Mortimer N. Grant, Henry G. Hay, Frederick H. Harvey, Mark Hopkins, John W. Hoyt, Wm. C. Irvine, James A. Johnston, Jesse Knight, Elliott N. Morgan, Edward J. Morris, John M. McCandlish, Herman F. Menough, Caleb P. Organ, Louis J. Palmer, C. W. Holden, H. G. Nickerson, A. L. Sutherland, W. E. Chaplin, Jonathan Jones, John L. Russell, Geo. W. Fox, Frank M. Foote, Chas. H. Burritt, Chas. N. Potter, D. A. Preston, John A. Riner, Geo. C. Smith, H. E. Teschemacher, C. L. Vagner, Thos. R. Reid, Robt. C. Butler, C. W. Burdick, De Forest Richards, Meyer Frank, M. C. Barrow, Richard H. Scott.

Click to view